South Dakota, session 2026, SB211.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 58-17-63 be AMENDED:
58-17-63. For the purposes of §§ 58-17-64, sections 2 to 5 inclusive, of this Act,
§§ 58-18-63, 58-38-36, and 58-40-33, a health benefit plan is any hospital or medical
policy or certificate, hospital or medical service plan, or health maintenance organization
subscriber contract. The term does not include specified disease, hospital indemnity, fixed
indemnity, fixed duration of one year or less, accident-only, credit, dental, vision,
medicare supplement, long-term care, or disability income insurance, coverage issued as
a supplement to liability insurance, workers' compensation or similar insurance, or
automobile medical payment insurance.
Section 2. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 58-17:
Terms used in this Act mean:
(1) "Ambulance service," any ground ambulance service licensed pursuant to chapter
34-11;
(2) "Emergency medical services," ambulance transportation and prehospital
emergency medical care provided to a patient;
(3) "Out-of-network provider," an ambulance service provider that does not have a
direct or contractual agreement with the patient’s health benefit plan.
Section 3. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 58-17:
An ambulance service provider may not bill, attempt to collect from, or otherwise
seek reimbursement from a patient for emergency medical services rendered on an out-
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.922.10 2 211
of-network basis, except for any coinsurance, copayment, or deductible amount, required
under the terms of the patient’s health benefit plan.
Section 4. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 58-17:
A health benefit plan must reimburse an out-of-network ambulance service
provider for emergency medical services at a rate not less than the rate established,
adopted, or recognized by the political subdivision from which the transport originated.
If no local rate has been established, adopted, or recognized, the reimbursement
must be the lesser of:
(1) The provider’s billed charge; or
(2) Two hundred seventy-five percent of the medicare allowable rate for the same
service.
A health benefit plan shall provide the reimbursement for emergency medical
services rendered on an out-of-network basis directly to the ambulance service provider
in accordance with the provisions set forth in chapter 58-12, unless otherwise agreed to
in writing by the plan and the provider.
Section 5. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 58-17:
Each ambulance service provider and health benefit plan shall furnish to a patient
a clear and concise explanation of benefits and a statement of any amount owed by the
patient.
With the exception of non-covered services, a patient is not liable for any amount
charged, beyond the applicable coinsurance, copayment, or deductible, required by the
patient's health benefit plan for emergency ambulance services.
Section 6. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 58-17:
Sections 2 to 5, inclusive, of this Act do not apply to a self-funded employer health
plan, medicaid, medicare, or any other federally regulated program.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.